Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.250

Penalty for unlawful solemnization—1909 c 249.

Every person who shall solemnize a marriage when either party thereto is known to him or her to be under the age of legal consent or a marriage to which, within his or her knowledge, any legal impediment exists, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 689; 1979 ex.s. c 128 s 3; 1909 c 249 s 419; RRS s 2671. Formerly RCW 26.04.240, part.]

NOTES:

Punishment of gross misdemeanor when not fixed by statute: RCW 9.92.020.